Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 4. Education Loan Program.
Sec. 14.43.160.
Definitions.

In AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.160

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“career education” means a course or program in vocational-technical training or education approved by the commission;

“federally insured” means a loan covered by the provisions of 20 U.S.C. 1001 — 1155, as amended;

“full-time student” means an undergraduate or career education student who is enrolled and is in regular attendance at classes for at least 12 semester hours of credit or the equivalent during the semester or a graduate student who is enrolled and is in regular attendance at classes for at least nine semester hours of credit or the equivalent; any combination of semester hours of credit, or the equivalent, aggregating to the requisite number of semester hours and undertaken during a semester at two or more public or private institutions of higher education constitutes full-time student status;

“half-time student” means an undergraduate, graduate, or career education student who, during the semester, is enrolled and is in regular attendance at classes at one or more public or private institutions of higher education for six to 11 semester credit hours or an equivalent of six to 11 semester credit hours, and includes a career education student enrolled and in regular attendance in classes for 15 hours a week or a graduate student who is enrolled and is in regular attendance at classes for the equivalent of six to eight semester hours of credit or the equivalent;

“school year” means an academic period that is a minimum of 30 weeks of instructional time that begins between July 1 of one year and June 30 of the following year;

“summer term” means the period from June 1 through August 31.

History.

(§ 5 ch 156 SLA 1972; am § 8 ch 78 SLA 1974; am §§ 18 — 20 ch 136 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 136 SLA 1975; am § 7 ch 246 SLA 1976; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 99 SLA 1977; am § 9 ch 87 SLA 1979; am § 11 ch 89 SLA 1981; am § 59 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 5 ch 34 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1985; am §§ 17, 29 ch 43 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2000; am § 28 ch 85 SLA 2001; am §§ 18, 19 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.806

. Renumbered in 1982.

Reorganized in 1985 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Paragraph (4) was enacted as (7). Renumbered in 1991, at which time former paragraph (2) was also deleted, and former paragraphs (3)-(4) were renumbered as (2)-(3).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (4), deleted “at least a total of” following “private institutions of higher education for”, twice added “to 11” following “6”, deleted “at least” following “attendance in classes for”, and added the language beginning “or a graduate student who is” to the end of the paragraph; in (5), substituted “begins between July 1 of one year and June 30 of the following year” for “begins between September 1 of one year and August 31 of the following year”.